src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
 ki+N+Msc: KI "dog" ;
 den+N+Msc: DEN "man" ;
 ojyon+N+Msc: OJYON "ox" ;
 kar+N+Sg:kar mutation "parent" ;
 kar+N+Pl:kerens mutation "parents" ;
 garlont GARLONT "garland" ;
 marchont GARLONT "merchant" ;
 tulyfant GARLONT "tulip" ;
 protestant GARLONT "protestant" ;
 abatti m "abbey" ;
 abes m "abbot" ;
 adhyskans m "education" ;
 afinans m "decoration" ;
 aghskrif m "pedigree" ;
 ahwer m "sorrow" ; !no plural listed
 akont m "account" ;
 akontyans m "reckoning" ;
 akord m "accord" ; !no plural listed
 akordyans m "agreement" ;
 akwityans m "receipt" ;
 babi m "baby" ;
 bagas m "group" ;
 bagas-gwari m "play group" ;
 bagasik m "batch" ;
 berrskrif m "summary" ;
 lyther m "letter" ;
 mammskrif m "original text" ;
 tas m "father" ;
 acheson m-ys "reason" ;
 adamant m-ys "diamond" ;
 akont m-ys "account" ;
 akontydh m-yon "accountant" ;
 aghskrifer:aghskrifor m-ag "genealogist" ;
 bleujenner:bleujennor m-ag "florist" ;
 begyer+N+Msc:begyor yonpl "beggar" ; !also m-s
 baban m-es "baby" ;
 badh m-es "boar" ;
 bacheler m-s "bachelor" ;
 balyer m-s "balyers" ;
 banana m-s "banana" ;
 begyer m-s "beggar" ;
 degre m-s "degree" ;
 gyglet m-s "wanton person" ;
 popynjay m-s "parrot" ;
 balek:bale3k m ;
 mab:ma4b m-yon "son" ;
 abostol:abo4sto4l m-aff-i "apostle" ; !not working yet
 adhvetter m-sgtantum "ripeness" ;
 Afrikan m-sgtantum "African" ;
 agha m-sgtantum "dread" ;
 badh m-sgtantum "bath" ;
 backen m-sgtantum "bacon" ;
 blam m-sgtantum "blame" ;
 blas m-sgtantum "taste, smell" ;
 arghans m-pltantum "money" ; !MF
 mona m-pltantum "money" ; !NW
 lavrok:lavrog m-ow ;
 lavrok:lavreg m-ow ; !UC
 chanj m-yow "change." ;
 fer m-yow "fair" ;
 heyl m-yow "estuary" ;
 kevals m-yow "joint" ;
 krygh m-yow "wrinkle" ;
 mengleudh m-yow "opencast mine-working." ;
 rin m-yow "mystery" ;
 uskitter m-yow "velocity" ;
 kanel m-ys "tap" ;
 mason m-ys "mason" ;
 desir m-ys "desire" ;
 enor m-ys "honour" ;
 entent m-ys "purpose" ;
 remetant m-ys "remain" ;
 sant m-ys "course of a meal" ;
 chalys m-ys "chalice" ;
 degre m-ys "degree" ;
 ertaj m-ys "heritage" ;
 offis m-ys "function" ;
 polat m-ys "fellow" ;
 rewl m-ys "rule" ;
 slod m-ys "sledgehammer" ;
 splat m-ys "plot of ground" ;
 tid m-ys "tide" ;
 trumach m-ys "passage by water" ;
 vertu m-ys "power" ;
 modrep:modreb f-edh ;
 taklen f "item" ;
 tanbellen f "bomb, shell (explosive)" ;
 tardhel f "vent, loophole, outlet " ;
 tavlinen f "tangent" ;
 tegen f "trinket, jewel" ;
 telynnyores f "harpist " ;
 tronn f "turn, caunter lode " ;
 pellen f "ball, dumpling," ;
 pennduen f "," ;
 f "" ;
 pennlinen f "headline pennlugarn (m.), pennlugern" ;
 pennseviges f "princess" ;
 pennwlas f "chief country" ;
 pib f "pipe, flute" ;
 plasen f "record, disc," ;
 plentyades f "plaintiff" ;
 plethen f "plait of hair, braid, reel (dance)" ;
 ploumen f "plum" ;
 plyw f "parish" ;
 ponsfordh f "viaduct" ;
 porthores f "porter " ;
 prenores f "buyer " ;
 prilehen f "tile" ;
 priweythva f "clay-works, pottery " ;
 prynses f "princess " ;
 pryven f "worm" ;
 pysklyn f "fish-pond" ;
 pythyonen f "," ;
 rakherdhel f "propeller" ;
 rannyeth f "dialect" ;
 ratheli f "grater, rasp" ;
 regydhen f ", regydh" ;
 reknel f "calculator" ;
 resell f "cursor, cross-wire," ;
 restrenva f "filing cabinet restrer (m.), comb" ;
 rewlel f "ruler (tool)" ;
 ros f "wheel, circle" ;
 routh f "crowd, throng," ;
 ruwvanes f "queen" ;
 savon f "standard" ;
 seth f "arrow" ;
 skath f "boat" ;
 skeusen f "photograph" ;
 skolores f "scholar" ;
 skubel f "broom (implement)" ;
 skyren f ", skyr splinter" ;
 souben f "soup, broth" ;
 spavnel f "iull" ;
 steus f "course (of study)" ;
 studhva f "study (room)" ;
 synsel f "clip (e.g. paper-clip)" ;
 testen f "subject (of study) " ;
 teudhva f "foundry " ;
 tigres f "tigress" ;
 toll f "tax, toll, duty" ;
 tonn f "wave, billow " ;
 torrva f "rupture, breach, breakdown" ;
 tra f "thing, article (object)" ;
 tresklen f ", treskel missel-thrush " ;
 trethyades f "female passenger in ferry " ;
 trevas f "harvest, crop " ;
 trosell f "pedal" ;
 truflen f "trifle" ;
 unnros f "unicycle" ;
 yeth f "language, way of speaking. " ;
 ynys f "island, isolated place." ;
 als f-yow "cliff" ;
 alter f-yow "altar" ;
 anwan f-yow "anvil" ;
 arwodh f-yow "sign, symbol, emblem, annorial device" ;
 avon f-yow "river" ;
 awel f-yow "wind, gale, weather" ;
 batel f-yow "battle" ;
 bleujen f-yow "flower, bloom, blossom" ;
 bownder f-yow "lane" ;
 breuslys f-yow "assize-court, court of law" ;
 brow f-yow "handmill, quern" ;
 bynk f-yow "platform, bench" ;
 kadon f-yow "chain, bond (link), trace" ;
 kalter f-yow "kettle" ;
 kansbledhen f-yow "century, hundred years" ;
 kasel f-yow "arm-pit, aisle underarm (US)" ;
 koloven f-yow "column" ;
 kow f-yow "enclosure, hollow" ;
 krows f-yow "cross, rood" ;
 kurun f-yow "crown" ;
 dama f-yow "mother" ;
 dowrlann f-yow "waterside" ;
 ehel f-yow "axle" ;
 elgeth f-yow "chin" ;
 eskeul f-yow "escalator" ;
 eur f-yow "time, o’clock" ;
 fenten f-yow "spring (water), fountain, surface well" ;
 finwedh f-yow "end, limit, cessation" ;
 fornes f-yow "furnace" ;
 gavel f-yow "grasp, hold, capacity" ;
 goon f-yow "downland, unenclosed pasture, moor (upland)" ;
 gwarthol f-yow "stirrup" ;
 gwers f-yow "gwers meythrin [?gw?rz?m???r?n] nursery-rhyme" ;
 gweyth f-yow "occasion (time)" ;
 hellys f-yow "old court" ;
 kador f-yow "chair, seat" ;
 kanel f-yow "channel, canal, water-channel, inlet of sea, television channel" ;
 kantol f-yow "spark-plug" ;
 kaskleudh f-yow "(pl" ;
 keryn f-yow "tub, butt (container), open barrel" ;
 kloos f-yow "hurdle, fence, crate, trellis, lattice, rack, harrow" ;
 klun f-yow "diwglun [?di?gl?n] (dl" ;
 koloven f-yow "column" ;
 kromlegh f-yow "cromlech, megalithic chamber-tomb" ;
 krowseryow f-yow "krowseryow" ;
 kusul f-yow "advice, counsel, opinion" ;
 kyst f-yow "box (container), chest" ;
 liv f-yow "lunch(eon)." ;
 loor f-yow "moon." ;
 lo f-yow "loyow spoon, ladle, spatula" ;
 mammvro f-yow "motherland." ;
 medyner f-yow "hinge." ;
 milvledhen f-yow "millennium." ;
 nas f-yow "nature (character)" ;
 ostel f-yow "lodging, hostel, hotel" ;
 pennseythen f-yow "weekend" ;
 penntir f-yow "headland" ;
 ragarwodh f-yow "portent " ;
 raw f-yow "strop, bond " ;
 rys f-yow "ford Rysoghen Oxford" ;
 sel f-yow "base, foundation " ;
 skol f-yow "school" ;
 strolgyst f-yow "litter-bin," ;
 treveglos f-yow "churchtown, village " ;
 troweyth f-yow "cycle (of motion)" ;
Faro m-yow "Pharaoh" ;
Kresvor m-yow "Mediterranean Sea" ;
Romanian m-yow "Romanian" ;
adla m-yow "outcast" ;
amalgam m-yow "amalgam" ;
apoyntyans m-yow "appointment" ;
arlenans m-yow "adhesion" ;
attal m-yow "repayment" ;
azalea m-yow "azalea" ;
bell m-yow "war" ;
bodhesik m-yow "amateur" ;
brednyas m-yow "mate" ;
browgik m-yow "minced meat" ;
chatelydh m-yow "capitalist" ;
dalghednans m-yow "chemical suspension" ;
de'Lun m-yow "Monday" ;
delni m-yow "blindness" ;
dewdhen m-yow "couple" ;
diswrians m-yow "ruin" ;
drogurans m-yow "smear" ;
enamel m-yow "enamel" ;
fastheans m-yow "ratification" ;
gallon m-yow "gallon" ;
golghas m-yow "washing" ;
goyeynder m-yow "chill" ;
gwerthji m-yow "shop" ;
haslet m-yow "contraceptive" ;
hulla m-yow "nightmare" ;
jentylys m-yow "graciousness" ;
kamfor m-yow "camphor" ;
kelghlavar m-yow "circumlocution" ;
kesweyth m-yow "structure" ;
klow m-yow "hearing" ;
korn-kewsel m-yow "megaphone" ;
krestednek m-yow "crustacean" ;
kynsskrif m-yow "preface" ;
leti m-yow "dairy" ;
lymmaval m-yow "lemon" ;
medhelheans m-yow "lenition" ;
milves m-yow "thousandth" ;
naker m-yow "kettle-drum" ;
odhom m-yow "necessity" ;
orsik m-yow "teddy-bear" ;
pednjustis m-yow "chief justice" ;
pesk m-yow "fish" ;
ponn m-yow "dust" ;
protestyans m-yow "protest" ;
ragober m-yow "preparation" ;
rowlyas m-yow "ruler" ;
shoppa m-yow "shop" ;
sobm m-yow "total" ;
stayr m-yow "stair" ;
tangasor m-yow "firefighter" ;
tewlwolow m-yow "dusk" ;
traytour m-yow "traitor" ;
trop m-yow "trope" ;
virus m-yow "virus" ;
zynk m-yow "zinc" ;
